Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS RELATING TO LICENSING

CHAPTER 59. INFORMATION RELATING TO LICENSING

Sec. 59.001. CONFIDENTIALITY OF SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER. The social security number of an applicant for or holder of a license, certificate of registration, or other legal authorization issued by a licensing agency to practice in a specific occupation or profession that is provided to the licensing agency is confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.001(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Renumbered from Occupations Code Sec. 56.001 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(112), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Occupations Code, Section 58.001 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(68), eff. September 1, 2005.